Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Mississippi Veterans Monument Commission

§ 55-15-51.
Repealed

Repealed by Section 55-15-63, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§55-15-51. [Laws, 1986, ch. 342, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 474, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 455, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 455, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 480, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 378, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 472, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 304, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.]

§ 55-15-53.
Repealed.

Repealed by Section 55-15-63, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§55-15-53. [Laws, 1986, ch. 342, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 392 § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 466, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 474, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 455, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 455, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 480, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 378, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 472, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 304, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.]

§ 55-15-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by Section 55-15-63, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§55-15-55. [Laws, 1986, ch. 342, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 474, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 455, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 455, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 480, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 378, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 472, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 304, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.]

§ 55-15-57.
Repealed.

Repealed by Section 55-15-63, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§55-15-57. [Laws, 1986, ch. 342, § 4; Laws, 1990, ch 456, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 466, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 474, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 455, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 455, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 480, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 378, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 472, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 304, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.]

§ 55-15-59.
Repealed.

Repealed by Section 55-15-63, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§55-15-59. [Laws, 1986, ch. 342, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 392, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 474, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 455, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2001, ch. 455, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 480, § 5; Laws, 2003, ch. 529, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 378, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 472, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 304, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015.]

§ 55-15-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Section 55-15-63, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§55-15-61. [Laws, 1990, ch. 422, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 474, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 455, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 455, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 480, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 378, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 472, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2015, ch. 304, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2015.]

§ 55-15-62.
Repealed.

Repealed by Section 55-15-63, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§55-15-62. [Laws, 2000, ch. 396, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 455, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 480, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 378, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 472, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 304, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2015.]

§ 55-15-63.
Repeal of Sections 55-15-51 through 55-15-62.

Sections 55-15-51 through 55-15-62, Mississippi Code of 1972, which create and empower the Mississippi Veterans Monument Commission, are repealed on July 1, 2016.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 466, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 474, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 455, § 7; Laws, 2001, ch. 455, § 8; Laws, 2002, ch. 480, § 8; Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 378, § 8; Laws, 2010, ch. 472, § 8; Laws, 2015, ch. 304, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2015.